test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kaapp_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kååʹpp a-stem kuoppa: # Noun - full paradigm
     kååʹpp+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: kååʹpp
     kååʹpp+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: kååʹv
     kååʹpp+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: kååʹv
     kååʹpp+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: kåppa
     kååʹpp+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: kååʹvest
     kååʹpp+N+Sg+Com+Indef: kooʹvin
     kååʹpp+N+Ess+Indef: kååʹppen
     kååʹpp+N+Par+Indef: kååʹpped
     kååʹpp+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [kååʹvtaa, kååʹvtää]
     kååʹpp+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: kååʹv
     kååʹpp+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: kooʹvi
     kååʹpp+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: kooʹvid
     kååʹpp+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: kooʹvid
     kååʹpp+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: kooʹvin
     kååʹpp+N+Pl+Com+Indef: kooʹvivuiʹm
     kååʹpp+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [kooʹvitaa, kooʹvitää]
